Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA FFA.new text end new text begin (a) $350,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $350,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of agriculture for grants to the Minnesota FFA to provide new and expanded access for Minnesota FFA members involved in art- and history-related FFA activities. Of this amount: new text end new text begin (1) up to $125,000 each year may be used to document and commemorate 100 years of fostering leadership, agricultural education, and community service across the state by creating a history book, video storytelling series, and an in-person arts-focused event; and new text end new text begin (2) any amount not spent for the purposes described in clause (1) may be used for other activities that provide new and expanded access for Minnesota FFA members involved in art- and history-related FFA activities, including activities related to national and state FFA band and choir, state and national FFA talent competitions, FFA floriculture, and FFA state fair landscape booths. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of agriculture must develop grant-making criteria and guidance for grants under this section to provide funding for projects and events and must seek input from the Minnesota FFA and Minnesota FFA Foundation. new text end